Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.470

Enforcement—Prosecutor assistance.

When a party alleging a violation of a protection order issued under this chapter states that the party is unable to afford private counsel and asks the prosecuting attorney for the county or the attorney for the municipality in which the order was issued for assistance, the attorney shall initiate and prosecute a contempt proceeding if there is probable cause to believe that the violation occurred. In this action, the court may require the violator of the order to pay the costs incurred in bringing the action, including a reasonable attorney's fee.

[ 2021 c 215 s 60.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.